North Carolina, session 2025, HB234.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 3 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 3. Senate districts; apportionment of Senators.
The Senators shall be elected from districts. The General Assembly, at the first regular session
convening after the return of every decennial census of population taken by order of Congress,
from time to time, shall revise the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators among those
districts, subject to the following requirements:
(1) Each Senator shall represent, as nearly as may be, an equal number of inhabitants, the
number of inhabitants that each Senator represents being determined for this purpose by dividing
the population of the district that he represents by the number of Senators apportioned to that
district;represent two counties;
(2) Each senate district shall at all times consist of contiguous territory;
(3) No county shall be divided in the formation of a senate district;
(4) When established, the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators shall remain
unaltered until the return of another decennial census of population taken by order of Congress."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Section 1. General Assembly to provide for local government.
The General Assembly shall provide for the organization and government and the fixing of
boundaries of counties, cities and towns, and other governmental subdivisions, and, except
subdivisions; provided, however, that the number of counties in the State shall be 100. Except as
otherwise prohibited by this Constitution, the General Assembly may give such powers and
duties to counties, cities and towns, and other governmental subdivisions as it may deem
advisable.
The General Assembly shall not incorporate as a city or town, nor shall it authorize to be
incorporated as a city or town, any territory lying within one mile of the corporate limits of any
other city or town having a population of 5,000 or more according to the most recent decennial
*H234-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
census of population taken by order of Congress, or lying within three miles of the corporate
limits of any other city or town having a population of 10,000 or more according to the most
recent decennial census of population taken by order of Congress, or lying within four miles of
the corporate limits of any other city or town having a population of 25,000 or more according
to the most recent decennial census of population taken by order of Congress, or lying within
five miles of the corporate limits of any other city or town having a population of 50,000 or more
according to the most recent decennial census of population taken by order of Congress.
Notwithstanding the foregoing limitations, the General Assembly may incorporate a city or town
by an act adopted by vote of three-fifths of all the members of each house."
SECTION 1.(c) The amendments set out in subsections (a) and (b) of this section
shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the general election in November 2026,
which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots,
voting systems, or both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The
question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
A constitutional amendment providing that each senator in the North Carolina
General Assembly represents two counties, permitting the General Assembly to revise the Senate
districts from time to time, and requiring the State be composed of 100 counties."
SECTION 1.(d) If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the
amendments set out in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the State Board of Elections shall
certify the amendments to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall enroll the
amendments so certified among the permanent records of that office. The amendments set out in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section are effective upon certification.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 234-First Edition